Wyoming, session 2025, HB0121.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-2-1501 through 35-2-1511 are
created to read:

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
ARTICLE 15
DISCLOSURE OF HOSPITAL PRICING

35-2-1501. Short title; purpose.

(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Hospital Price Transparency Act."

(b) The purpose of this act is to require hospitals
to disclose prices for certain items and services, to
provide civil penalties and to prohibit debt collection by
noncompliant facilities.

35-2-1502. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Ancillary service" means a facility item or
service that a facility customarily provides as part of a
shoppable service;

(ii) "Department" means the department of
health;
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

(iii) "De-identified maximum negotiated charge"
means the highest charge a facility has negotiated with all
third party payors for a facility item or service;

(iv) "De-identified minimum negotiated charge"
means the lowest charge a facility has negotiated with all
third party payors for a facility item or service;

(v) "Discounted cash price" means the charge
that applies to a person who pays cash, or a cash
equivalent, for a facility item or service;

(vi) "Facility" means a hospital licensed under
title 35 of the Wyoming statutes;

(vii) "Facility item or service" means all items
and services, including individual items and services and
service packages, that may be provided by a facility to a
patient in connection with an inpatient admission or an
outpatient department visit for which the facility has
established a standard charge, including:

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(A) Supplies and procedures;

(B) Room and board;

(C) Use of the facility and other areas,
generally referred to as facility fees;

(D) Services of health care providers
employed by the facility, generally referred to as
professional charges;

(E) Any other item or service for which a
facility has established a standard charge.

(viii) "Gross charge" means the charge for a
facility item or service that is reflected on a facility's
list, less any discounts;

(ix) "Machine-readable format" means a digital
representation of information that can be imported or read
into a computer system for processing;

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(x) "Payor-specific negotiated charge" means the
charge that a facility has negotiated with a third party
payor for a facility item or service;

(xi) "Shoppable service" means a service that
may be scheduled by a patient in advance;

(xii) "Standard charge" means the regular rate
established by the facility for a facility item or service
provided to a specific group of paying patients. The term
includes all of the following:

(A) The gross charge;

(B) The payor-specific negotiated charge;

(C) The de-identified minimum negotiated
charge;

(D) The de-identified maximum negotiated
charge;

(E) The discounted cash price.
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

(xiii) "Third-party payor" means a person that
is, by statute, contract or agreement, legally responsible
for payment of a claim for a facility item or service;

(xiv) "This act" means W.S. 35-2-1501 through
35-2-1511.

35-2-1503. Public availability of price information;
requirements.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a facility shall
make public:

(i) A digital file in a machine-readable format
that contains a list of all standard charges, expressed in
dollar amounts, for all facility items or services as
described by W.S. 35-2-1504;

(ii) A consumer-friendly list of standard
charges for a limited set of shoppable services as provided
in W.S. 35-2-1505.

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
35-2-1504. List of standard charges required.

(a) A facility shall:

(i) Maintain a list of all standard charges for
all facility items or services in accordance with this
section; and

(ii) Make the list required under paragraph (i)
of this subsection available at all times to the public,
including by posting the list in the manner provided by
this section.

(b) The standard charges contained in the list
required to be maintained by a facility under subsection
(a) of this section shall reflect the standard charges
applicable to that location of the facility, regardless of
whether the facility operates in more than one (1) location
or operates under the same license as another facility.

(c) The list required under subsection (a) of this
section shall include the following items, if applicable:

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(i) A description of each facility item or
service provided by the facility;

(ii) The following charges, expressed in dollar
amounts, for each individual facility item or service when
provided in either an inpatient setting or an outpatient
department setting:

(A) The gross charge;

(B) The de-identified minimum negotiated
charge;

(C) The de-identified maximum negotiated
charge;

(D) The discounted cash price;

(E) The payor-specific negotiated charge,
listed by the name of the third party payor and plan
associated with the charge and displayed in a manner that
clearly associates the charge with each third party payor
and plan; and
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

(F) Any code used by the facility for
purposes of accounting or billing for the facility item or
service.

(d) The list required by subsection (a) of this
section shall be displayed in a prominent location on the
home page of the facility's publicly accessible website or
accessible through a link on that website. If the facility
operates multiple locations and maintains a single website,
the list shall be posted for each location the facility
operates in a manner that clearly associates the list with
the applicable location of the facility.

(e) The list required under subsection (a) of this
subsection shall:

(i) Be available:

(A) Free of charge;

(B) Without having to establish a user
account or password;
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

(C) Without having to submit personal
identifying information;

(D) Without having to enter a code to
access the list.

(ii) Be accessible to a common commercial
operator of an internet search engine to the extent
necessary for the search engine to index and display the
list as a result in response to a search query of a user of
the search engine;

(iii) Be formatted in a manner prescribed by the
department;

(iv) Be digitally searchable;

(v) Use the naming convention specified by the
centers for Medicare and Medicaid services.

(f) In prescribing the format for the list under
paragraph (e)(iii) of this section, the department shall:
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

(i) Develop a template that each facility shall
use in formatting the list;

(ii) Consider any applicable federal guidelines
for formatting similar lists required by federal law or
rule and ensure that the design of the template enables
health care researchers to compare the charges contained in
the lists maintained by each facility; and

(iii) Design the template to be substantially
similar to the template used by the centers for Medicare
and Medicaid services for purposes similar to those of this
act, if the department determines that designing the
template in that manner serves the purposes of paragraph
(ii) of this subsection and that the department benefits
from developing and requiring that substantially similar
design.

(g) Each facility shall update the list required by
subsection (a) of this section not less than annually. Each
facility shall clearly indicate the date on which the list
was updated.
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

35-2-1505. Consumer-friendly list of shoppable
services; requirements.

(a) A facility shall maintain and make publicly
available a list of the standard charges described by W.S.
35-2-1504(c) for not less than three hundred (300)
shoppable services provided by the facility. Each facility
may select the shoppable services to be included in the
list, except that the list shall include:

(i) The seventy (70) services specified by the
centers for Medicare and Medicaid services in 45 C.F.R.
part 180; or

(ii) If the facility does not provide all of the
shoppable services described by paragraph (i) of this
subsection, as many of those shoppable services as the
facility does provide. Services that are not provided but
are Medicare and Medicaid listed services shall be
identified by the facility; and

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(iii) State each location where a facility
provides the shoppable service and whether the standard
charges included in the list apply at that location to the
provision of that shoppable service in an inpatient
setting, an outpatient department setting or in both of
those settings.

(b) In selecting a shoppable service for purposes of
inclusion in the list required by subsection (a) of this
section, a facility shall:

(i) Consider how frequently the facility
provides the services and the facility's billing rate for
that service; and

(ii) Prioritize the selection of services that
are among the services most frequently provided by the
facility.

(c) The list required by subsection (a) of this
section shall be:

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(i) Displayed in a manner prescribed by W.S.
35-2-1504(d);

(ii) Available:

(A) Free of charge;

(B) Without having to register or establish
a user account or password;

(C) Without having to submit personal
identifying information; and

(D) Without having to enter a code to
access the list.

(iii) Searchable by service description, billing
code and third party payor;

(iv) Updated in the manner prescribed by W.S.
35-2-1504(g);

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(v) Accessible to a common commercial operation
of an internet search engine to the extent necessary for
the search engine to index and display the list as a result
in response to a search query of a user of the search
engine; and

(vi) Formatted in a manner that is consistent
with the format prescribed by the department under W.S.
35-2-1504(e)(iii).

35-2-1506. Reporting requirement.

Each time a facility updates a list as required by W.S.
35-2-1504(g) and 35-2-1505(c)(iv), the facility shall
submit the updated list to the department. The department
shall prescribe the form in which the updated list shall be
submitted to the department.

35-2-1507. Monitoring.

(a) The department shall monitor each facility's
compliance with the requirements of this act using any of
the following methods:
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

(i) Evaluating complaints made by persons to the
department regarding noncompliance with the act;

(ii) Reviewing any analysis prepared regarding
noncompliance with this act;

(iii) Auditing the websites of facilities for
compliance with this act;

(iv) Confirming that each facility submitted the
lists as required by W.S. 35-2-1506.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, in considering an application for renewal of a
facility's license or certificate, the department shall
consider whether a facility is or has been in compliance
with this act.

35-2-1508. Material violation; corrective action
plan.

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(a) A facility materially violates this act if the
facility fails to:

(i) Comply with the requirements of W.S.
35-2-1503; or

(ii) Publicize the facility's standard charges
in the form and manner required by W.S. 35-2-1504 and
35-2-1505.

(b) If the department determines that a facility has
materially violated this act, the department shall issue a
material violation notice to the facility and request that
the facility submit a corrective action plan. The notice
shall indicate the form and manner that the corrective
action plan shall be submitted to the department and shall
clearly state the date by which the facility shall submit
the plan.

(c) The facility that receives a notice under
subsection (b) of this section shall:

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(i) Submit a corrective action plan in the form
and manner, and by the specified date, prescribed by the
notice of violation; and

(ii) As soon as practicable after submission of
a corrective action plan to the department and after
department approval under subsection (e) of this section,
act to comply with the plan.

(d) A corrective action plan submitted to the
department shall:

(i) Describe in detail the corrective action the
facility will take to address any violation identified by
the department in the notice provided under subsection (b)
of this section; and

(ii) Provide a date by which the facility will
complete the corrective action plan.

(e) A corrective action plan is subject to review and
approval by the department. After the department reviews
and approves a facility's corrective action plan, the
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
department shall monitor and evaluate the facility's
compliance with the plan.

(f) A facility is considered to have failed to
respond to the department's request to submit a corrective
action plan if the facility fails to submit a corrective
action plan:

(i) In the form and manner specified in the
notice under subsection (b) of this section; or

(ii) By the date specified in the notice
provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(g) A facility is considered to have failed to comply
with a corrective action plan if the facility fails to
address a violation within the specified period of time
contained in the plan.

35-2-1509. Civil penalty; notice of violations.

(a) The department shall impose a civil penalty on a
facility if a facility fails to:
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

(i) Respond to the department's notice to submit
a corrective action plan; or

(ii) Comply with the requirements of a
corrective action plan submitted to the department.

(b) The department shall impose a civil penalty on a
facility of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) per day for
each day a facility fails to comply with subsection (a) of
this section.

(c) Beginning October 1, 2025, the department shall
create and maintain a publicly available list on its
website of facilities that have been found in violation of
this act, that have been issued a civil penalty or sent a
warning notice and that have been sent a request for a
corrective action plan from the department. Such penalties,
notices and communications shall be subject to public
disclosure under 5 U.S.C. § 552, notwithstanding any
exemptions or exclusions to the contrary, in full without
redaction. The list required by this subsection shall be
updated every thirty (30) days.
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

35-2-1510. Legislative recommendations.

The department shall propose to the legislature any
necessary recommendations for amending this act, including
recommendations in response to amendments by the centers
for Medicare and Medicaid services to 45 C.F.R. Part 180.

35-2-1511. Prohibiting collective action of debt
against patients by non-compliant facilities.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Collection action" means any of the
following actions taken with respect to a debt for items
and services that were purchased from or provided to a
patient by a facility on a date during which the facility
was in material noncompliance with this act:

(A) Attempting to collect a debt from a
patient or patient guarantor by referring the debt,
directly or indirectly, to a debt collector, a collection
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
agency or a third party payor retained by or on behalf of
the facility;

(B) Suing the patient or patient guarantor,
or enforcing an arbitration or mediation agreement; or

(C) Directly or indirectly causing a report
to be made to a consumer reporting agency.

(ii) "Collection agency" means any:

(A) Person who engages in a business the
principal purpose of which is the collection of debts; or

(B) Person who:

(I) Regularly collects or attempts to
collect, directly or indirectly, debts owed, due or
asserted to be owed or due to another;

(II) Takes assignment of debts for
collection purposes; or

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(III) Directly or indirectly solicits
for collection debts owed, due or asserted to be owed or
due to another.

(iii) "Consumer reporting agency" means any
person who, for monetary fees, dues or on a cooperative
nonprofit basis, regularly engages, in whole or in part, in
the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit
information or other information on consumers for the
purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties.
"Consumer reporting agency" includes any person defined in
15 U.S.C. § 1681a(f). "Consumer reporting agency" shall not
include any business entity that provides check
verification or check guarantee services only;

(iv) "Debt" means any obligation or alleged
obligation of a consumer to pay money arising out of a
transaction, whether or not the obligation has been reduced
to a judgment. "Debt" shall not include a debt for
business, investment, commercial or agricultural purposes;

(v) "Debt collector" means any person employed
or engaged by a collection agency to perform the collection
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
of debts owed, due or asserted to be owed or due to
another.

(b) A facility that is in material noncompliance with
this act on the date that items and services are purchased
from or provided to a patient by the facility shall not
initiate or pursue a collection action against the patient
or patient guarantor for a debt owed for the item or
services.

(c) If a patient provides documentation that a
facility was in material noncompliance with this act on a
date that items or services were purchased by or provided
to the patient, and the facility takes collection action
against the patient or patient guarantor, the patient or
patient guarantor may file suit to determine if the
facility was materially out of compliance with this act on
the date of service, and the noncompliance is related to
the items and services. The facility shall not take a
collection action against the patient or patient guarantor
while the lawsuit is pending.

HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356
(d) A facility that has been found by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be materially out of compliance
with this act:

(i) Shall refund the payor any amount of the
debt the payor has paid and shall pay a penalty to the
patient or patient guarantor in an amount equal to the
total amount of the debt;

(ii) Shall dismiss or cause to be dismissed any
court action with prejudice and pay any attorney fees and
costs incurred by the patient or patient guarantor relating
to the action; and

(iii) Remove or cause to be removed from the
patient or patient guarantor's credit report any report
made to a consumer reporting agency relating to the debt.

(e) Nothing in this section:

(i) Prohibits a facility from billing a patient,
patient guarantor or third party payor for items or
services provided to the patient; or
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

(ii) Requires a facility to refund any payment
made to the facility for items or services provided to the
patient, provided no collection action is taken in
violation of this section.

Section 2. W.S. 35‑2‑905(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vi) is amended to read:

35-2-905. Conditions, monitoring or revoking a
license.

(a) The division may place conditions upon a license,
install a division approved monitor or manager at the
owner's or operator's expense, suspend admissions, or deny,
suspend or revoke a license issued under this act if a
licensee:

(vi) Violates any provision of W.S. 35-2-1501
through 35-2-1511.

Section 3. The department of health shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.
HB0121

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0356

Section 4.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0121